Utah statutes.
64-13-7.   Offenders in custody of department.

All offenders committed for incarceration in a state correctional facility, for supervision on probation or parole, or for evaluation, shall be placed in the custody of the department. The department shall establish procedures and is responsible for the appropriate assignment or transfer of public offenders to facilities or programs.



Amended by Chapter 116, 1987 General Session

